Rhode Island, session 2025, SB720.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-3-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-3 entitled "Property
Subject to Taxation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-3-31. Providence — Certain tax exemptions.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of general or special law to the contrary, the city
council of the city of Providence is authorized to fix, by ordinance or resolution, the amount of the
exemptions with respect to assessed value from local taxation on taxable property to the following
persons: veterans and the unmarried widow or widower of veterans as defined in § 44-3-4 at three
thousand dollars ($3,000); for persons who are blind as defined in § 44-3-12 at eighteen thousand
dollars ($18,000); for veterans or the unmarried widow or widower of veterans who are totally
disabled as defined in section 44-3-4 at six thousand dollars ($6,000); for gold star parents as
defined in § 44-3-5 at nine thousand dollars ($9,000); for persons who are one hundred percent
(100%) disabled as determined pursuant to title II and title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42
U.S.C. § 401 et seq., and 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., or who, by reason of their being one hundred
percent (100%) disabled, are receiving disability payments from sources other than the Social
Security Administration (such as employees of the railroad, federal civil service, postal service,
and the Providence police and fire departments) at nine thousand dollars ($9,000); for specially
adapted housing for veterans with paraplegia as defined in § 44-3-4 at thirty thousand dollars
($30,000); for any person sixty-five (65) years of age, or over, at ten thousand dollars ($10,000);
for any person sixty-two (62) through sixty-four (64) years of age, who is receiving social security

benefits, ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any increase in exemption provided for in this section
over the amount previously provided by general or special law applies only to real property.
The city council of the city of Providence is hereby authorized, by ordinance or resolution,
to exempt from taxation a specified dollar amount of real and/or personal property of qualified
individuals as defined in §§ 44-3-4 and 44-3-5, who are residents of the city of Providence and are:
(1) Veterans of war;
(2) Unmarried spouses of veterans of war;
(3) Veterans or the unmarried widow or widower of veterans who are one hundred percent
(100%) totally disabled through service connected disability;
(4) For persons who are one hundred percent (100%) disabled as determined pursuant to
title II and title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq., and 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et
seq., or who, by reason of their being one hundred percent (100%) disabled, are receiving disability
payments from sources other than the social security administration (such as employees of the
railroad, federal civil service, postal service, and the Providence police and fire departments or any
person receiving federal disability retirement):
(5) Persons who are blind as provided in § 44-3-12;
(6) Gold star parents as provided in § 44-3-5;
(7) Veterans who were prisoners of war;
(8) Any person sixty-five (65) years of age, or over;
(9) Any person sixty-two (62) through sixty-four (64) years of age, who is receiving social
security benefits;
(10) Using the exemption for specially adapted housing for veterans with paraplegia as
defined in § 44-3-4.
(b) The city council of the city of Providence may subject the exemptions provided in this
section to verifications with respect to qualification for exemptions that it deems necessary or
desirable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001618
========
LC001618 - Page 2 of 3